Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2805.01
Accrediting body, defined.

Accrediting
body means an entity recognized by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services
to provide accrediting services for the Medicare Part B Home Medical Equipment
Services Benefit.

Laws 2009, LB604, § 3.